Missouri, session 2026, SB1392.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 565.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 565.020,
to read as follows:
565.020. 1. A person commits the offense of murder in
the first degree if he or she knowingly causes the death of
another person after deliberation upon the matter or if he
or she knowingly delivers or distributes fentanyl or
carfentanil, or any derivative or combination thereof, and
death results from the use of such substances.
2. The offense of murder in the first degree is a
class A felony, and, if a person is eighteen years of age or
older at the time of the offense, the punishment shall be
either death or imprisonment for life without eligibility
for probation or parole, or release except by act of the
governor. If a person has not reached his or her eighteenth
birthday at the time of the commission of the offense, the
punishment shall be as provided under section 565.033.
✓